District of Columbia statutes.
29-301.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Business Corporation Act of 2010”.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Cross References

Cooperative associations, applicability of this chapter, see § 29-938.
Reciprocal insurance company conversions, applicability of this chapter, see § 31-754.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 44-603.